Indiana, session 2026, SB273.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 36-8-16.6-11, AS AMENDED BY P.L.119-2024,
SECTION 7, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 11. (a) The board shall impose a 911 service
prepaid wireless charge on each retail transaction. The charge is not
required to be paid by an eligible telecommunications carrier that is
required to pay the monthly statewide 911 fee under IC 36-8-16.7-32
for the same transaction. The amount of the charge is one dollar ($1).
two dollars ($2). The board may increase the 911 service prepaid
wireless charge to ensure adequate revenue for the board to fulfill its
duties and obligations under this chapter and IC 36-8-16.7. The
following apply to an increase in the 911 service prepaid wireless
charge:
(1) The board may increase the charge only one (1) time after
April 30, 2023, and before July 1, 2026, in an amount not to
exceed ten cents ($0.10).
(2) The board may increase the charge only after review by the
budget committee.
2026 IN 273—LS 7020/DI 119


(b) A consumer that is the federal government or an agency of the
federal government is exempt from the 911 service prepaid wireless
charge imposed under this section.
(c) This subsection applies to an eligible telecommunications carrier
for purposes of receiving Lifeline reimbursement from the universal
service fund through the administrator designated by the Federal
Communications Commission. An eligible telecommunications carrier:
(1) is not considered an agency of the federal government for
purposes of the exemption set forth in subsection (b); and
(2) with respect to prepaid wireless telecommunications service
provided to end users by the eligible telecommunications carrier
in its capacity as an eligible telecommunications carrier, is liable
for the charge imposed under subsection (d).
(d) Beginning September 1, 2015, and on the first day of each
month thereafter, an eligible telecommunications carrier described in
subsection (c) shall pay to the board a charge equal to the product of
the following factors:
(1) The 911 service prepaid wireless charge established under
subsection (a).
(2) The number of unique end users for which the eligible
telecommunications carrier received reimbursement from the
universal service fund during the immediately preceding month.
The eligible telecommunications carrier may bill and collect from each
end user the charges calculated under this subsection with respect to
the end user. The eligible telecommunications carrier shall determine
the manner in which the eligible telecommunications carrier bills and
collects the charges. Except as provided in section 15 of this chapter,
an eligible telecommunications carrier may not bill and collect from an
end user an amount greater than the charges paid by the eligible
telecommunications carrier to the board with respect to the end user.
(e) If the board increases the 911 service prepaid wireless charge
under subsection (a), the board shall provide written notice to the
department of state revenue not later than sixty (60) days before the
date the increase takes effect that includes:
(1) the effective date for the increase; and
(2) the amount of the charge as increased by the board.
SECTION 2. IC 36-8-16.7-32, AS AMENDED BY P.L.119-2024,
SECTION 22, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 32. (a) Except as provided in subsections (b) and
(d), and subject to section 48(e) of this chapter, the board shall assess
a monthly statewide 911 fee on each standard user that is a customer
having a place of primary use in Indiana at a rate that ensures full
2026 IN 273—LS 7020/DI 119


recovery of the amount needed for the board to make distributions to
county treasurers consistent with this chapter and that provides for the
proper development, operation, and maintenance of a statewide 911
system. The amount of the fee assessed under this subsection is one
dollar ($1). two dollars ($2). The board may adjust the statewide 911
fee to ensure adequate revenue for the board to fulfill the board's duties
and obligations under this chapter, subject to the following:
(1) The following apply to an increase in the fee:
(A) The board may increase the fee only one (1) time after
April 30, 2023, and before July 1, 2026, in an amount not to
exceed ten cents ($0.10).
(B) The board may increase the fee only after review by the
budget committee.
(2) The fee may not be lowered more than one (1) time in a
calendar year.
(3) The fee may not be lowered by an amount that is more than
ten cents ($0.10) without legislative approval.
(b) The fee assessed under this section does not apply to a prepaid
user in a retail transaction under IC 36-8-16.6.
(c) An additional fee relating to the provision of 911 service may
not be levied by a state agency or local unit of government. A 911
service prepaid wireless charge (as defined in IC 36-8-16.6-0.5) is not
considered an additional fee relating to the provision of wireless 911
service for purposes of this section.
(d) A user is exempt from the fee if the user is any of the following:
(1) The federal government or an agency of the federal
government.
(2) The state or an agency or instrumentality of the state.
(3) A political subdivision (as defined in IC 36-1-2-13) or an
agency of a political subdivision.
(4) A user that accesses communications service solely through
a wireless data only service plan.
(e) This subsection applies to an eligible telecommunications carrier
for purposes of receiving Lifeline reimbursement from the universal
service fund through the administrator designated by the Federal
Communications Commission. An eligible telecommunications carrier:
(1) is not considered an agency of the federal government for
purposes of the exemption set forth in subsection (d); and
(2) with respect to communications service provided to end users
by the eligible telecommunications carrier in its capacity as an
eligible telecommunications carrier, is liable for the fee assessed
under subsection (f).
2026 IN 273—LS 7020/DI 119


(f) Beginning September 1, 2015, and on the first day of each month
thereafter, an eligible telecommunications carrier described in
subsection (e) shall pay to the board a fee equal to the product of the
following factors:
(1) The monthly statewide 911 fee established under subsection
(a).
(2) The number of unique end users for which the eligible
telecommunications carrier received reimbursement from the
universal service fund during the immediately preceding month.
The eligible telecommunications carrier may bill and collect from each
end user the fees calculated under this subsection with respect to the
end user. The eligible telecommunications carrier shall determine the
manner in which the eligible telecommunications carrier bills and
collects the fees. Except as provided in section 33(d) of this chapter, an
eligible telecommunications carrier may not bill and collect from an
end user an amount greater than the fees paid by the eligible
telecommunications carrier to the board with respect to the end user.
(g) If the board increases or decreases the statewide 911 fee under
subsection (a), the board shall provide written notice to the department
of state revenue not later than sixty (60) days before the date the
increase or decrease takes effect that includes:
(1) the effective date for the increase or decrease; and
(2) the amount of the charge as increased or decreased by the
board.
2026 IN 273—LS 7020/DI 119